Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that with the enactment of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801 during the 2025 legislative session, the legislature addressed the state transportation system's pressing near, mid, and long-term needs that necessitated reliance on reliable funding resources, as well as the efficient use of those resources. Because the production, maintenance, and utilization of transportation resources across the state continues to be an inherently complex, multifaceted issue, the legislature intends with this act to continue to address these resource needs by addressing certain topics from Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801, and associated matters, that require additional legislative work.PART I: SALES TAX PROVISIONS AND RECREATIONAL VESSEL TAXSec. 101. RCW 82.08.020 and 2025 c 418 s 3 and 2025 c 417 s 201 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of:(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services, if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale.(2)(a) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to:(i) Eleven and nine-tenths percent of the selling price from January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026; and(ii)(A) Nine and nine-tenths percent of the selling price beginning January 1, 2027.(B) The revenue collected under (a) of this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2027, there is levied and collected an additional tax on peer-to-peer car sharing transactions equal to the selling price multiplied by the rate of tax imposed under (a) of this subsection. This subsection (2)(b) applies only to peer-to-peer car sharing transactions where the vehicle owner obtained the shared vehicle as a vehicle for resale using a reseller permit or an approved exemption certificate under RCW 82.04.470. The revenue collected under this subsection (2)(b) must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (2)(b), "peer-to-peer car sharing" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.74A.010. "Peer-to-peer car sharing" does not mean:(A) "Retail car rental" as defined in RCW 82.08.011; or(B) "Rental car" as defined in RCW 46.04.465 or 48.115.005.(3) There is levied and collected an additional tax of five-tenths of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(4)(a) ((Beginning July 1, 2026, in addition to taxes required under this chapter and chapters 82.12 and 82.49 RCW, there))There is levied and collected an additional tax of five-tenths of one percent on the selling price, plus trade-in property of like kind, ((for purchased recreational vessels.(b) In the case of a lease requiring periodic payments, the tax is imposed on the fair market value of the recreational vessel at the inception of the lease.(c)))on each retail sale of a recreational vessel in the state. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(((d)))(b) For purposes of this subsection, "recreational vessel" means a vessel as defined in RCW 88.02.310 that is subject to watercraft excise tax under chapter 82.49 RCW.(5) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the production of cannabis;(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310; and(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.(6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.(7) Beginning July 1, 2027, the portion of taxes collected by the state under subsection (1) of this section equal to 0.1 percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(8) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail sales of the same property.(9) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.Sec. 102. RCW 82.12.020 and 2025 c 418 s 4 and 2025 c 417 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied and collected from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer any:(a) Article of tangible personal property acquired by the user in any manner, including tangible personal property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including by-products used by the manufacturer thereof, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are available for purchase within this state;(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or both;(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((c)))(b), excluding services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) that are provided free of charge;(d) Extended warranty; or(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service, including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of use.(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((c)))(b), if the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor;(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services, which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.(5) Beginning July 1, 2027, the portion of taxes collected by the state under subsection (1) of this section equal to 0.1 percent of the value of the article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the taxpayer, must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(6) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person" includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.(((7)(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, the tax imposed in this section at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(4) applies to the use of a recreational vessel at the time that it is first used in this state by the consumer.(b) The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(c) For purposes of this subsection, "recreational vessel" means a vessel as defined in RCW 88.02.310 that is subject to watercraft excise tax under chapter 82.49 RCW.))PART II: LUXURY VEHICLE TAXSec. 201. RCW 82.08.817 and 2025 c 417 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (((3)))(4) of this section, in addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020, there is levied and collected an additional tax of eight percent on the sale of a motor vehicle if:(i) The selling price of the motor vehicle plus trade-in property of like kind for purchased vehicles exceeds $100,000; or(ii) In the case of a lease requiring periodic payments, the ((fair market)) value of the motor vehicle exceeds $100,000 at the inception of the lease.(b) The additional tax imposed in this subsection (1):(i) Is equal to the portion of the selling price plus trade-in property of like kind for purchased vehicles in excess of the deduction amount specified in subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by eight percent; or(ii) In the case of a lease requiring periodic payments, is the ((fair market)) value of the motor vehicle in excess of the deduction amount specified in subsection (2) of this ((subsection))section, at the inception of the lease, multiplied by eight percent.(2) The deduction amount is $100,000 for fiscal year 2026. The deduction amount must be annually adjusted on July 1st of each year by increasing the amount by two percent and rounding the result to the nearest whole dollar.(3)(a) In the case of a lease requiring periodic payments, the total tax due under this section for a leased motor vehicle may be collected and remitted proportionally with each lease payment over the term of the lease. The proportional amount of tax due with each lease payment must equal the total tax due divided by the number of scheduled lease payments.(b) If a lease described in this subsection terminates before the end of the scheduled lease term, any unpaid portion of the tax imposed under this section becomes immediately due and payable at the time of lease termination. The department is authorized to adopt rules to prescribe the specific requirements and timelines for the collection, recording, and reporting of the tax due under this subsection.(c) The lessor is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax imposed under this subsection.(4) The taxes imposed under this section do not apply to the sale or lease of:(a)(i) A commercial motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.25.010; ((or(b)))(ii) A motor vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 10,000 pounds other than motor homes, as defined in RCW 46.04.305; or(iii) From July 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026, a motor home, as defined in RCW 46.04.305.(b) The exemptions available for the sale of motor vehicles under RCW 82.08.0317 and 82.08.0264 also apply to the tax under this section.(((4)))(5) The revenue collected under this section must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(((5)))(6) For the purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.818, the following definitions apply:(a) "Fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010.(b) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:(i) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the production of cannabis;(ii) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;(iii) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310; and(iv) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.(((b)))(c) "Value of the motor vehicle" means the fair market value of the motor vehicle((. In the case of a leased motor vehicle in which the consumer is required to make periodic lease payments, "value of the motor vehicle" means the fair market value of the motor vehicle at the inception of the lease))plus the value of trade-in property of like kind.Sec. 202. RCW 82.12.818 and 2025 c 417 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, in addition to the tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020, there is levied and collected from every person in this state a tax for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer any motor vehicle if the value of the motor vehicle exceeds $100,000.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the tax is levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the motor vehicle that exceeds the deduction amount specified in (c) of this subsection, multiplied by eight percent.(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax under this section from the purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to ((the amount of the purchase price that exceeds))eight percent of the remainder that results when the amount specified in (c) of this subsection((, multiplied by eight percent))is deducted from the sum of the selling price and the value of trade-in property of like kind.(c) The deduction amount is $100,000 for fiscal year 2026. The deduction amount must be annually adjusted on July 1st of each year by increasing the amount by two percent and rounding the result to the nearest whole dollar.(3) The taxes imposed under this section do not apply to the use of:(a) A commercial motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.25.010; ((or))(b) A motor vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 10,000 pounds other than motor homes, as defined in RCW 46.04.305; or(c) From July 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026, a motor home, as defined in RCW 46.04.305.(4) The revenue collected under this section must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(5) For the purposes of this section, "value of the motor vehicle" means the same as in RCW 82.08.817.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 203. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this section, the department shall waive penalties and interest otherwise due under this chapter if all of the following conditions are met:(a)(i) The penalties and interest are imposed with respect to additional motor vehicle taxes imposed under RCW 82.12.818 and 82.08.817; and (ii) the tax liability is directly attributable to a failure to collect additional motor vehicle taxes as provided in sections 203 and 204, chapter 417, Laws of 2025 for tax reporting periods through June 30, 2026;(b) The taxpayer files with the department any amended or outstanding returns covering tax liabilities with respect to which a penalty and interest waiver under this section is requested;(c) The taxpayer remits full payment to the department of the balance due on all tax liabilities for which a penalty and interest waiver under this section is requested or enters into a payment agreement with the department as provided in RCW 82.32.080 for such liabilities;(d) The taxpayer has timely filed returns and remitted payment on all taxes due for a period of 24 months immediately preceding the period covered by the return for which the waiver is being requested; and(e) The taxpayer must never have had an evasion penalty assessed against the taxpayer by the department under RCW 82.32.090 or a penalty assessed against the taxpayer by the department under RCW 82.32.291 for misusing a reseller permit or resale certificate.(2)(a) The taxpayer must submit a completed application for a penalty and interest waiver under this section in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(b) Applications for a penalty and interest waiver under this section must be submitted to the department on or before September 30, 2027.(3) All tax liability reported and paid as required in subsection (1) of this section is subject to verification by the department as provided in RCW 82.32.050. This section does not preclude the assessment of taxes, penalties, and interest with respect to any amounts determined by the department to have been underpaid for any tax period for which the taxpayer previously received penalty relief under this section.(4) This section does not apply to tax liabilities associated with additional motor vehicle taxes imposed under RCW 82.12.818 and 82.08.817 for tax reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 2026.(5) This section expires January 1, 2029.PART III: FUEL TAX INFLATION DISTRIBUTION CLARIFICATIONSec. 301. RCW 82.38.030 and 2025 c 417 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied and imposed upon fuel licensees a tax at the rate of 23 cents per gallon of fuel.(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate of five cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees. This subsection (2) expires when the bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are retired.(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative tax rate of three cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative tax rate of three cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, an additional and cumulative tax rate of two cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(6) Beginning July 1, 2008, an additional and cumulative tax rate of one and one-half cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(7) Beginning August 1, 2015, an additional and cumulative tax rate of seven cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(8) Beginning July 1, 2016, an additional and cumulative tax rate of four and nine-tenths cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(9) Beginning July 1, 2025, an additional and cumulative tax rate of six cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(10) Beginning July 1, 2025, an additional and cumulative tax rate of three cents per gallon of special fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(11) Beginning July 1, 2027, an additional and cumulative tax rate of three cents per gallon of special fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(12)(((a))) Beginning July 1, 2026, ((the fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (9) of this section must be increased annually by two percent and the resulting fuel tax rate must be rounded to the nearest one-thousandth of $1.(b)))an additional and cumulative tax rate per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees. The tax rate imposed under this subsection is calculated each July 1st by:(a) Increasing by two percent the sum of:(i) The fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (9) of this section as of the current July 1st; and(ii) The fuel tax rate imposed under this subsection (12) for the prior 12 months;(b) Subtracting the sum of the fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (9) of this section as of the current July 1st; and(c) Rounding the result to the nearest one-thousandth of $1.(13) Beginning July 1, 2028, ((the fuel tax rate imposed under subsections (10) and (11) of this section must be increased annually by two percent and the resulting fuel tax rate must be rounded to the nearest one-thousandth of $1.(13)))an additional and cumulative tax rate per gallon of special fuel is imposed on fuel licensees. The tax rate imposed under this subsection is calculated each July 1st by:(a) Increasing by two percent the sum of:(i) The fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (11) of this section as of the current July 1st; and(ii) The fuel tax rates imposed, for the prior 12 months, under both subsection (12) of this section and this subsection (13);(b) Subtracting the sum of the fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (12) of this section as of the current July 1st; and(c) Rounding the result to the nearest one-thousandth of $1.(14) Taxes are imposed when:(a) Fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is by a licensed supplier or distributor for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or the removal is by a fuel supplier for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;(b) Fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensed supplier; or(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed supplier or distributor for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a licensed supplier for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;(c) Fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage, unless the fuel enters this state for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320, if either of the following applies:(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensed supplier; or(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;(d) Fuel enters this state by means outside the bulk transfer-terminal system and is delivered directly to a licensed terminal unless the owner is a licensed distributor or supplier;(e) Fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the fuel;(f) Blended fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended fuel subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of blended fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of previously taxed fuel used to produce the blended fuel;(g) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the fuel tax;(h) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter;(i) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and(j) Fuel is sold by a licensed fuel supplier to a fuel distributor or fuel blender and the fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.Sec. 302. RCW 46.68.090 and 2025 c 417 s 103 and 2025 c 416 s 706 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the fuel tax must be first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount must be distributed monthly by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2) through (9) of this section.(a) For payment of refunds of fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the fuel tax, which sums must be distributed monthly.(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(1) must be distributed as set forth in (a) through (j) of this subsection.(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;(b)(i) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special category C projects. Special category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will require bond financing to complete construction.(ii) The following criteria, listed in order of priority, must be used in determining which special category C projects have the highest priority:(A) Accident experience;(B) Fatal accident experience;(C) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and(D) Continuity of development of the highway transportation network.(iii) Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under this subsection (2)(b);(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;(e) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there must be distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW 47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW 46.68.120;(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds must be distributed by the county road administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each county and must be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road administration board must adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management system is used. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the county arterial preservation account may also be used for staffing-related expenses of the board, contracting costs, and grants associated with bridge ratings;(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.(3) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(2) must be distributed to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account).(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(3) must be distributed as follows:(a) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(b) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and(c) The remainder must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(4) must be distributed as follows:(a) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(b) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and(c) The remainder must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (5) and (6) must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(7) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (7) and (8) must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395.(8) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (9) through (((12)))(13) must be distributed as follows:(a) Two and one-half percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(b) Two and one-half percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and(c) The remainder must be distributed to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.(9) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise taxes on fuel.PART IV: REPEAL OF LUXURY AIRCRAFT TAX, AIRCRAFT FUEL TAX INCREASE, AND OTHER AIRCRAFT PROVISIONSSec. 401. RCW 82.32.145 and 2025 c 417 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever the department has issued a warrant under RCW 82.32.210 for the collection of unpaid trust fund taxes from a limited liability business entity and that business entity has been terminated, dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the department may pursue collection of the entity's unpaid trust fund taxes, including penalties and interest on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the fair market value of its assets. The department may presume that an entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the department the nature of its assets and liabilities.(2) Personal liability under this section may be imposed for state and local trust fund taxes.(3)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or should have been aware of the unpaid trust fund tax liability of the limited liability business entity.(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this section applies only if he or she willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid to the department the trust fund taxes due from the limited liability business entity.(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (4)(a), a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer is liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability accrued during the period that he or she was the chief executive or chief financial officer. However, if the responsible individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes to the department during any period of time that the person was not the chief executive or chief financial officer, that individual is also liable for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period that he or she had the duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department but was not the chief executive or chief financial officer.(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period he or she had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department.(5) Persons described in subsection (3)(b) of this section are exempt from liability under this section in situations where nonpayment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes is due to reasons beyond their control as determined by the department by rule.(6) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, and 82.32.200.(7) This section does not relieve the limited liability business entity of its trust fund tax liability or otherwise impair other tax collection remedies afforded by law.(8) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this chapter apply to collections under this section.(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation; or for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the management of the company or organization.(b) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a corporation; or for entities or organizations other than corporations or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers, the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the financial activities of the entire company or organization.(c) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or more of the general partners are also limited liability business entities.(d) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006.(e) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006, except that the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability companies.(f) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a corporation, including the president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer.(g)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued by the department.(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's unpaid trust fund tax liability reflected in a tax warrant issued by the department.(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any other limited liability business entity involved directly in the management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection (9)(g)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued against it by the department.(h) "Trust fund taxes" means taxes collected from purchasers and held in trust under RCW 82.08.050, including taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020, 82.08.150, 82.08.817, 82.12.818, ((82.48A.010, 82.48A.020,)) and 82.51.010.(i) "Willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.Sec. 402. RCW 82.42.020 and 2022 c 182 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:There is levied upon every distributor of aircraft fuel, an excise tax at the rate of ((18))25 cents on each gallon of aircraft fuel sold, delivered, or used in this state. There must be collected from every user of aircraft fuel either the use tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. The taxes imposed by this chapter must be collected and paid to the state but once in respect to any aircraft fuel.Sec. 403. RCW 82.42.090 and 2025 c 417 s 1304 are each amended to read as follows:((All moneys))(1) Seventy-two percent of the revenue collected by the director from the aircraft fuel excise tax as provided in RCW 82.42.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and shall be credited to the aeronautics account hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for aviation-related purposes.(2) Twenty-eight percent of the revenue collected by the director from the aircraft fuel excise tax as provided in RCW 82.42.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and shall be credited to the sustainable aviation fuel airport infrastructure account created in section 409 of this act.(3) Moneys collected from the consumer or user of aircraft fuel from either the use tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the state general fund.Sec. 404. RCW 47.68.250 and 2021 c 131 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Every aircraft, inclusive of commercial unpiloted aircraft systems, must be registered with the department for each calendar year in which the aircraft is operated or is based within this state. A fee of ((fifteen dollars))$30, to be adjusted annually as provided in (b) of this subsection, is charged for each such registration and each annual renewal thereof.(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, the aircraft registration fee required in (a) of this subsection must be adjusted annually by increasing the fee by two percent and the result must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar.(2) The department must review the fee schedule based on the number of unpiloted aircraft systems registered under any single entity. Consideration should be given to the cost to administer the program and the number of commercial aircraft registered in the state. The department shall collaborate with the department of commerce, the department of revenue, and industry representatives in determining any recommendations to revise the initial fee. The report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.(3) Possession of the appropriate effective federal certificate, permit, rating, or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of the aircraft, and payment of the excise tax imposed by Title 82 RCW for the privilege of using the aircraft within this state during the year for which the registration is sought, and payment of the registration fee required by this section are the only requisites for registration of an aircraft under this section.(4) The registration fee imposed by this section is payable to and collected by the secretary. The fee for any calendar year must be paid during the month of January, and collected by the secretary at the time of the collection by him or her of the excise tax. If the secretary is satisfied that the requirements for registration of the aircraft have been met, he or she must issue to the owner of the aircraft a certificate of registration therefor. The secretary must pay to the state treasurer the registration fees collected under this section((, which registration fees must be credited to the aeronautics account))with 50 percent deposited in the aeronautics account created in RCW 82.42.090 and 50 percent deposited in the sustainable aviation fuel account created in RCW 43.31.645.(5) It is not necessary for the registrant to provide the secretary with originals or copies of federal certificates, permits, ratings, or licenses. The secretary must issue certificates of registration, or such other evidences of registration or payment of fees as he or she may deem proper; and in connection therewith may prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition of such certificates or other evidences.(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to:(a) An aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any government or any political subdivision thereof, including the government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, which is not engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;(b) An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;(c) An aircraft that is owned by a nonresident if:(i) The aircraft remains in this state or is based in this state, or both, for a period less than ((ninety))90 days; or(ii) The aircraft is a large private airplane as defined in RCW 82.08.215 and remains in this state for a period of ((ninety))90 days or longer, but only when:(A) The airplane is in this state exclusively for the purpose of repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, including any flight testing related to the repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, or for the purpose of continual storage of not less than one full calendar year;(B) An employee of the facility providing these services is on board the airplane during any flight testing; and(C) Within ((ninety))90 days of the date the airplane first arrived in this state during the calendar year, the nonresident files a written statement with the department indicating that the airplane is exempt from registration under this subsection (6)(c)(ii). The written statement must be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must include such information as the department requires. The department may require additional periodic verification that the airplane remains exempt from registration under this subsection (6)(c)(ii) and that written statements conform with the provisions of chapter 5.50 RCW;(d) A piloted aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying constituting an act of interstate or foreign commerce;(e) An aircraft owned by the commercial manufacturer thereof while being operated for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews for purchasers of the aircraft;(f) An aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW;(g) An aircraft based within the state that is in an unairworthy condition, is not operated within the registration period, and has obtained a written exemption issued by the secretary; and(h) Unpiloted aircraft systems used exclusively for hobby or recreation.(7) The secretary must be notified within ((thirty))30 days of any change in ownership of a registered aircraft. The notification must contain the N, NC, NR, NL, or NX number of the aircraft, the full name and address of the former owner, and the full name and address of the new owner. For failure to so notify the secretary, the registration of that aircraft may be canceled by the secretary, subject to reinstatement upon application and payment of a reinstatement fee of ((ten dollars))$10 by the new owner.(8) A municipality or port district that owns, operates, or leases an airport, as defined in RCW 47.68.020, with the intent to operate, must require from an aircraft owner proof of aircraft registration as a condition of leasing or selling tiedown or hangar space for an aircraft. It is the responsibility of the lessee or purchaser to register the aircraft. Proof of registration must be provided according to the following schedule:(a) For the purchase of tiedown or hangar space, the municipality or port district must allow the purchaser ((thirty))30 days from the date of the application for purchase to produce proof of aircraft registration.(b) For the lease of tiedown or hangar space that extends ((thirty))30 days or more, the municipality or port district must allow the lessee ((thirty))30 days to produce proof of aircraft registration from the date of the application for lease of tiedown or hangar space.(c) For the lease of tiedown or hangar space that extends less than ((thirty))30 days, the municipality or port district must allow the lessee to produce proof of aircraft registration at any point prior to the final day of the lease.(9) The airport must work with the aviation division to assist in its efforts to register aircraft by providing information about based aircraft on an annual basis as requested by the division.(10) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 405. RCW 47.68.250 and 2021 c 131 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Every aircraft, inclusive of commercial unpiloted aircraft systems, must be registered with the department for each calendar year in which the aircraft is operated or is based within this state. A fee of ((fifteen dollars))$30, to be adjusted annually as provided in (b) of this subsection, is charged for each such registration and each annual renewal thereof.(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, the aircraft registration fee required in (a) of this subsection must be adjusted annually by increasing the fee by two percent and the result must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar.(2) The department must review the fee schedule based on the number of unpiloted aircraft systems registered under any single entity. Consideration should be given to the cost to administer the program and the number of commercial aircraft registered in the state. The department shall collaborate with the department of commerce, the department of revenue, and industry representatives in determining any recommendations to revise the initial fee. The report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.(3) Possession of the appropriate effective federal certificate, permit, rating, or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of the aircraft, and payment of the excise tax imposed by Title 82 RCW for the privilege of using the aircraft within this state during the year for which the registration is sought, and payment of the registration fee required by this section are the only requisites for registration of an aircraft under this section.(4) The registration fee imposed by this section is payable to and collected by the secretary. The fee for any calendar year must be paid during the month of January, and must be collected by the secretary at the time of the collection by him or her of the excise tax. If the secretary is satisfied that the requirements for registration of the aircraft have been met, he or she must issue to the owner of the aircraft a certificate of registration therefor. The secretary must pay to the state treasurer the registration fees collected under this section((, which registration fees must be credited to the aeronautics account))with 50 percent deposited in the aeronautics account created in RCW 82.42.090 and 50 percent deposited in the sustainable aviation fuel account created in RCW 43.31.645.(5) It is not necessary for the registrant to provide the secretary with originals or copies of federal certificates, permits, ratings, or licenses. The secretary must issue certificates of registration, or such other evidences of registration or payment of fees as he or she may deem proper; and in connection therewith may prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition of such certificates or other evidences.(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to:(a) An aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any government or any political subdivision thereof, including the government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, which is not engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;(b) An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;(c) An aircraft that is owned by a nonresident if:(i) The aircraft remains in this state or is based in this state, or both, for a period less than ((ninety))90 days; or(ii) The aircraft is a large private airplane as defined in RCW 82.08.215 and remains in this state for a period of ((ninety))90 days or longer, but only when:(A) The airplane is in this state exclusively for the purpose of repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, including any flight testing related to the repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, or for the purpose of continual storage of not less than one full calendar year;(B) An employee of the facility providing these services is on board the airplane during any flight testing; and(C) Within ((ninety))90 days of the date the airplane first arrived in this state during the calendar year, the nonresident files a written statement with the department indicating that the airplane is exempt from registration under this subsection (6)(c)(ii). The written statement must be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must include such information as the department requires. The department may require additional periodic verification that the airplane remains exempt from registration under this subsection (6)(c)(ii) and that written statements conform with the provisions of chapter 5.50 RCW;(d) A piloted aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying constituting an act of interstate or foreign commerce;(e) An aircraft owned by the commercial manufacturer thereof while being operated for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews for purchasers of the aircraft;(f) An aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW;(g) An aircraft based within the state that is in an unairworthy condition, is not operated within the registration period, and has obtained a written exemption issued by the secretary; and(h) Unpiloted aircraft systems used exclusively for hobby or recreation.(7) The secretary must be notified within ((thirty))30 days of any change in ownership of a registered aircraft. The notification must contain the N, NC, NR, NL, or NX number of the aircraft, the full name and address of the former owner, and the full name and address of the new owner. For failure to so notify the secretary, the registration of that aircraft may be canceled by the secretary, subject to reinstatement upon application and payment of a reinstatement fee of ((ten dollars))$10 by the new owner.(8) A municipality or port district that owns, operates, or leases an airport, as defined in RCW 47.68.020, with the intent to operate, must require from an aircraft owner proof of aircraft registration as a condition of leasing or selling tiedown or hangar space for an aircraft. It is the responsibility of the lessee or purchaser to register the aircraft. Proof of registration must be provided according to the following schedule:(a) For the purchase of tiedown or hangar space, the municipality or port district must allow the purchaser ((thirty))30 days from the date of the application for purchase to produce proof of aircraft registration.(b) For the lease of tiedown or hangar space that extends ((thirty))30 days or more, the municipality or port district must allow the lessee ((thirty))30 days to produce proof of aircraft registration from the date of the application for lease of tiedown or hangar space.(c) For the lease of tiedown or hangar space that extends less than ((thirty))30 days, the municipality or port district must allow the lessee to produce proof of aircraft registration at any point prior to the final day of the lease.(9) The airport must work with the aviation division to assist in its efforts to register aircraft by providing information about based aircraft on an annual basis as requested by the division.(10) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 406. RCW 82.48.030 and 2013 c 56 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, and as adjusted annually as provided in (c) of this subsection, the amount of the tax imposed by this chapter for each calendar year is as follows:Â ((Type of aircraftRegistration feeÂ Single engine fixed wing$50Â Â Small multi-engine fixed wing65Â Â Large multi-engine fixed wing80Â Â Turboprop multi-engine fixed wing100Â Â Turbojet multi-engine fixed wing125Â Â Helicopter75Â Â Sailplane20Â Â Lighter than air20Â Â Home built20))Â Â Registration Fee ScheduleType of aircraftPart 1Part 2TotalÂ Â Â Â Â Â Â Single engine fixed wing$50$70$120Small multi-engine fixed wing65155220Large multi-engine fixed wing80140220Turboprop multi-engine fixed wing100370470Turbojet multi-engine fixed wing12510951220Helicopter75145220Sailplane20100120Lighter than air20100120Home built20100120Commercial unpiloted aircraft systems0120120(b) The amount of tax, adjusted annually as provided in (c) of this subsection, imposed by this chapter for each calendar year with respect to aircraft owned and operated by a commuter air carrier that is not an airplane company as defined in RCW 84.12.200 is as follows:((Gross maximum take-off weight of the aircraftRegistration feeLess than 4,001 lbs.$5004,001-6,000 lbs.$1,0006,001-8,000 lbs.$2,0008,001-9,000 lbs.$3,0009,001-12,500 lbs.$4,000))Â Registration Fee ScheduleGross maximum take-off weight of the aircraftPart 1Part 2TotalÂ Â Â Â Â Â Â Less than 4,001 lbs.$500$500$10004,001-6,000 lbs.Â 1000Â 1000Â 20006,001-8,000 lbs.Â 2000Â 2000Â 40008,001-9,000 lbs.Â 3000Â 3000Â 60009,001-12,500 lbs.Â 4000Â 4000Â 8000(c) Beginning January 1, 2028, the excise taxes required in (a) and (b) of this subsection must be adjusted annually by increasing the registration fee by two percent and the result must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar.(2)(a) The amount of tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section for each calendar year must be divided into ((twelve))12 parts corresponding to the months of the calendar year and the excise tax upon an aircraft registered for the first time in this state after the last day of any month may only be levied for the remaining months of the calendar year including the month in which the aircraft is being registered. However, the minimum amount payable is ((three dollars))$3.(b) An aircraft is deemed registered for the first time in this state when such aircraft was not previously registered by this state for the year immediately preceding the year in which application for registration is made.Sec. 407. RCW 82.48.080 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary must regularly pay to the state treasurer the excise taxes collected under this chapter((, which must be credited by the state treasurer)).(2) All excise taxes collected under part 1 of the registration fee schedule in RCW 82.48.030(1) (a) and (b) must be credited to the aeronautics account for state grants to airports and the administrative expenses associated with grant execution and the collection of excise taxes under this chapter.(3) All excise taxes collected under part 2 of the registration fee schedule in RCW 82.48.030(1) (a) and (b) must be credited to the sustainable aviation fuel account created in RCW 43.31.645.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 408. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 82.48A.010 (Luxury aircraft tax) and 2025 c 417 s 207;(2) RCW 82.48A.020 (Use tax if value of aircraft exceeds $500,000âException) and 2025 c 417 s 208;(3) RCW 82.48A.030 (Deposit for revenue collected) and 2025 c 417 s 209; and(4) RCW 82.48A.040 (Administration) and 2025 c 417 s 210.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 409. A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:The sustainable aviation fuel airport infrastructure account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from section 403(2) of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for activities at airports that support sustainable aviation fuel infrastructure improvement projects and sustainable aviation fuel infrastructure preservation projects.PART V: TIRE FEE SELLER RETENTION AMOUNT CLARIFICATIONSec. 501. RCW 70A.205.405 and 2025 c 417 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied a $5 per tire fee on the retail sale of new replacement vehicle tires. The fee imposed in this section must be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the buyer by the seller less the ((ten percent)) amount retained by the seller as provided in RCW 70A.205.430(1) must be paid to the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.(2) The department of revenue shall incorporate into the agency's regular audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of tires sold and the amount of revenue collected by the businesses selling new replacement vehicle tires at retail. The department of revenue shall collect on the business excise tax return from the businesses selling new replacement vehicle tires at retail:(a) The number of tires sold; and(b) The fee levied in this section.(3) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to the fee imposed under this section. The department of revenue shall administer this section.(4) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and does not include retreaded vehicle tires.PART VI: TOW TRUCK IMPOUNDSSec. 601. 2025 c 417 s 1406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:Sections 1307 through 1309 of this act take effect ((February 1, 2026))July 1, 2027.PART VII: REMOVAL OF EXPIRED ALTERNATIVE FUEL VEHICLE TAX INCENTIVE REPORTING REQUIREMENTSec. 701. RCW 82.08.9999 and 2022 c 182 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning August 1, 2019, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after the qualification period start date:(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply as provided in (b) of this subsection to sales or leases of new or used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles that:(i) Are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel; or(ii) Use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least 30 miles using only battery power; and(iii)(A) Have a vehicle selling price plus trade-in property of like kind for purchased vehicles that:(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $45,000; or(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $30,000; or(B) Have a fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles that:(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $45,000; or(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $30,000;(b)(i) The exemption in this section is applicable for up to the amounts specified in (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection of:(A) The total amount of the vehicle's selling price, for sales made; or(B) The total lease payments made plus any additional selling price of the leased vehicle if the original lessee purchases the leased vehicle before the qualification period end date, for lease agreements signed.(ii) Based on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed of the vehicle if the vehicle is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed:(A) From the qualification period start date until July 31, 2021, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $25,000;(B) From August 1, 2021, until July 31, 2023, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $20,000;(C) From August 1, 2023, until July 31, 2025, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $15,000.(iii) If the vehicle is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $16,000.(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. A person claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(3)(a) The department of licensing must maintain and publish a list of all vehicle models qualifying for the tax exemptions under this section or RCW 82.12.9999 until the expiration date of this section, and is authorized to issue final rulings on vehicle model qualification for these criteria. A seller is not responsible for repayment of the tax exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 for a vehicle if the department of licensing's published list of qualifying vehicle models on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed includes the vehicle model and the department of licensing subsequently removes the vehicle model from the published list, and, if applicable, the vehicle meets the qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).(b) The department of revenue retains responsibility for determining whether a vehicle meets the applicable qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).(4) By the last day of October 2019, and every six months thereafter until ((this section expires))October 31, 2025, based on the best available data, the department must report the following information to the transportation committees of the legislature: The cumulative number of vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 by month of purchase or lease start and vehicle make and model; the dollar amount of all state retail sales and use taxes exempted on or after the qualification period start date, under this section and RCW 82.12.9999; and estimates of the future costs of leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999.(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Clean alternative fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2019, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.(b) "Fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010.(c) "New vehicle" has the same meaning as "new motor vehicle" in RCW 46.04.358.(d) "Qualification period end date" means August 1, 2025.(e) "Qualification period start date" means August 1, 2019.(f) "Used vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.660.(6)(a) Sales of vehicles delivered to the buyer or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the qualification period end date do not qualify for the exemption under this section.(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the qualification period end date must continue to receive the exemption as described under subsection (1)(b) of this section on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease before August 1, 2028.(7) This section expires August 1, 2028.(8) This section is supported by the revenues generated in RCW 46.17.324, and therefore takes effect only if RCW 46.17.324 is enacted by June 30, 2019.PART VIII: TRANSIT GRANTSSec. 801. RCW 47.66.130 and 2022 c 182 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish a bus and bus facilities grant program. The purpose of this competitive grant program is to provide grants to any transit authority for the replacement, expansion, rehabilitation, and purchase of transit rolling stock; construction, modification, or rehabilitation of transit facilities; safety or security enhancements for transit rolling stock or transit facilities; and funding to adapt to technological change or innovation through the retrofitting of transit rolling stock and facilities.(2)(a) The department must incorporate environmental justice principles into the grant selection process, with the goal of increasing the distribution of funding to communities based on addressing environmental harms and provide environmental benefits for overburdened communities, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010, and vulnerable populations.(b) The department must incorporate geographic diversity into the grant selection process.(c) No grantee may receive more than 35 percent of the amount appropriated for the grant program in a particular biennium.(d) Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.(e) Grant funds may not be used for any expenses relating to armed security.(3) The department must establish an advisory committee to carry out the mandates of this section, including assisting with the establishment of grant criteria.(4) The department must report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of any grant projects funded by the program created under this section.(5) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Transit authority" means a city transit system under RCW 35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county public transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public transportation benefit area under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area under RCW 36.57.100, or any special purpose district formed to operate a public transportation system.(b) "Transit rolling stock" means transit vehicles including, but not limited to, buses, ferries, and vans.PART IX: OLDER DRIVERSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 901. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) By January 1, 2028, the department, after consulting with the appropriate organizations, shall create and implement an older driver reduced fee identicard program.(2) The fee for the identicard is $5 regardless of issuance time period.(3) Older drivers eligible for the program are currently licensed drivers aged 70 years or older who agree to voluntarily replace their driver's license with an identicard, provided the individual:(a) Meets the department criteria under RCW 46.20.117;(b) Meets the department criteria under RCW 46.20.202, if the eligible older driver wishes to obtain an enhanced identicard; and(c) Is expected to reside in a location within Washington state.(4) Older drivers eligible for the program qualify for the $5 reduced fee identicard for one identicard issuance only.(5) The department is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement the older driver reduced fee identicard program under this section.PART X: TOLL COLLECTIONSec. 1001. RCW 46.63.160 and 2015 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) This section applies only to civil penalties for nonpayment of tolls detected through use of photo toll systems.(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a), (b), or (c).(3) A notice of civil penalty may be issued by the department of transportation when a toll is assessed through use of a photo toll system and the toll is not paid by the toll payment due date, which is ((eighty))80 days from the date the vehicle uses the toll facility and incurs the toll charge.(4) Any registered owner or renter of a vehicle traveling upon a toll facility operated under chapter 47.56 or 47.46 RCW is subject to a civil penalty governed by the administrative procedures set forth in this section when the vehicle incurs a toll charge and the toll is not paid by the toll payment due date, which is ((eighty))80 days from the date the vehicle uses the toll facility and incurs the toll charge.(5)(a) The department shall develop rules to allow an individual who has been issued a notice of civil penalty to present evidence of mitigating circumstances as to why a toll bill was not timely paid. If an individual is able to present verifiable evidence to the department that a civil penalty was incurred due to hospitalization, military deployment, eviction, homelessness, death of the alleged violator or of an alleged violator's immediate family member, failure to receive the toll bill due to an incorrect email or physical address that has since been corrected, a prepaid electronic toll account error that has since been corrected, an error made by the department or an agent of the department, or other mitigating circumstances as determined by the department, the department may dismiss or reduce the civil penalty and associated fees.(b)(i) Consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, the department of transportation shall develop an administrative adjudication process to review appeals of civil penalties issued by the department of transportation for toll nonpayment detected through the use of a photo toll system under this section. The department of transportation shall submit to the transportation committees of the legislature an annual report on the number of times adjudicators reduce or dismiss the civil penalty as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection and the total amount of the civil penalties dismissed. The report must be submitted by December 1st of each year.(ii) During the adjudication process, the alleged violator must have an opportunity to explain mitigating circumstances as to why the toll bill was not timely paid. Hospitalization, a divorce decree or legal separation agreement resulting in a transfer of the vehicle, an active duty member of the military or national guard covered by the federal service members civil relief act, 50 U.S.C. Sec. 501 et seq., or state service members' civil relief act, chapter 38.42 RCW, eviction, homelessness, the death of the alleged violator or of an immediate family member, being switched to a different method of toll payment, if the alleged violator did not receive a toll charge bill or notice of civil penalty, or other mitigating circumstances as determined by the adjudicator are deemed valid mitigating circumstances. All of the reasons that constitute mitigating circumstances must have occurred within a reasonable time of the alleged toll violation. In response to these circumstances, the adjudicator may reduce or dismiss the civil penalty and associated administrative fees.(6) The use of a photo toll system is subject to the following requirements:(a) Photo toll systems may take photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only.(b) A notice of civil penalty must include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images produced by a photo toll system, stating the facts supporting the notice of civil penalty. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding established under subsection (5) of this section. The photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images evidencing the toll nonpayment civil penalty must be available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the civil penalty.(c)(i) By June 30, 2016, prior to issuing a notice of civil penalty to a registered owner of a vehicle listed on an active prepaid electronic toll account, the department of transportation must:(A) Send an ((electronic mail))email notice to the email address provided in the prepaid electronic toll account of unpaid pay-by-mail toll bills at least ((ten))10 days prior to a notice of civil penalty being issued for the associated pay-by-mail toll. The notice must be separate from any regular notice sent by the department; and(B) Call the phone numbers provided in the account to provide notice of unpaid pay-by-mail toll bills at least ((ten))10 days prior to a notice of civil penalty being issued for the associated pay-by-mail toll.(ii) The department is relieved of its obligation to provide notice as required by this section if the customer has declined to receive communications from the department through such methods.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, other recorded images, or other records identifying a specific instance of travel prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of the tolling agency for toll collection and enforcement purposes and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a civil penalty under this section. No photograph, digital photograph, microphotograph, videotape, other recorded image, or other record identifying a specific instance of travel may be used for any purpose other than toll collection or enforcement of civil penalties under this section. Records identifying a specific instance of travel by a specific person or vehicle must be retained only as required to ensure payment and enforcement of tolls and to comply with state records retention policies.(e) All locations where a photo toll system is used must be clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where tolls are assessed and enforced by a photo toll system.(f) Within existing resources, the department of transportation shall conduct education and outreach efforts at least six months prior to activating an all-electronic photo toll system. Methods of outreach shall include a department presence at community meetings in the vicinity of a toll facility, signage, and information published in local media. Information provided shall include notice of when all electronic photo tolling shall begin and methods of payment. Additionally, the department shall provide quarterly reporting on education and outreach efforts and other data related to the issuance of civil penalties.(g) The envelope or electronic message containing a toll charge bill or related notice issued pursuant to RCW 47.46.105 or 47.56.795, or a notice of civil penalty issued under this section, must prominently indicate that the contents are time sensitive and related to a toll violation.(7) Civil penalties for toll nonpayment detected through the use of photo toll systems must be issued to the registered owner of the vehicle identified by the photo toll system, but are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.(8) The civil penalty for toll nonpayment detected through the use of a photo toll system is ((forty dollars))$40 plus the photo toll and associated fees.(9) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, all civil penalties, including the photo toll and associated fees, collected under this section must be deposited into the toll facility account of the facility on which the toll was assessed. However, through June 30, 2013, civil penalties deposited into the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account created under RCW 47.56.165 that are in excess of amounts necessary to support the toll adjudication process applicable to toll collection on the Tacoma Narrows bridge must first be allocated toward repayment of operating loans and reserve payments provided to the account from the motor vehicle ((account [fund]))fund under section 1005(15), chapter 518, Laws of 2007. Additionally, all civil penalties, resulting from nonpayment of tolls on the state route number 520 corridor, shall be deposited into the state route number 520 civil penalties account created under section 4, chapter 248, Laws of 2010 but only if chapter 248, Laws of 2010 is enacted by June 30, 2010.(10) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the department of transportation shall, before a toll bill is issued, provide a written notice to the rental car business that a toll bill may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within ((thirty))30 days of the mailing of the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the toll was assessed; or(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the toll was assessed because the vehicle was stolen at the time the toll was assessed. A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable toll and fee.Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this section for the payment of the toll.(11) It is the intent of the legislature that the department provide an educational opportunity when vehicle owners incur fees and penalties associated with late payment of tolls for the first time. As part of this educational opportunity, the department may waive penalties and fees if the issue that resulted in the toll not being timely paid has been resolved and the vehicle owner establishes an electronic toll account, if practicable. To aid in collecting tolls in a timely manner, the department may waive or reduce the outstanding amounts of fees and penalties assessed when tolls are not timely paid.(12)(a) By June 30, 2016, the department of transportation must update its website, and accommodate access to the website from mobile platforms, to allow toll customers to efficiently manage all their tolling accounts, regardless of method of payment.(b)(i) By June 30, 2016, the department of transportation must make available to the public a point of access that allows a third party to develop an application for mobile technologies that (A) securely accesses a user's toll account information and (B) allows the user to manage his or her toll account to the same extent possible through the department's website.(ii) If the department determines that it would be cost-effective and in the best interests of the citizens of Washington, it may also develop an application for mobile technologies that allows toll customers to manage all of their tolling accounts from a mobile platform.(13) When acquiring a new photo toll system, the department of transportation must enable the new system to:(a) Connect with the department of licensing's vehicle record system so that a prepaid electronic toll account can be updated automatically when a toll customer's vehicle record is updated, if the customer has consented to such updates; and(b) Document when any toll is assessed for a vehicle listed in a prepaid electronic toll account in the monthly statement that is made available to the electronic toll account holder regardless of whether the method of payment for the toll is via pay-by-mail or prepaid electronic toll account.(14) Consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, the department of transportation shall develop rules to implement this section.(15) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Photo toll system" means the system defined in RCW 47.56.010 and 47.46.020.(b) "Prepaid electronic toll account" means a prepaid toll account linked to a pass or license plate number, including "Good to Go!".(16) If a customer's toll charge or civil penalty is waived pursuant to this section due to an error made by the department, or an agent of the department, in reading the customer's license plate, the secretary of transportation must send a letter to the customer apologizing for the error.PART XI: PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION BENEFIT AREASSec. 1101. RCW 36.57A.145 and 2025 c 417 s 1001 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A public transportation benefit area authority as provided in subsection (2) of this section may, pursuant to an interlocal agreement, annex an adjacent city operating a transit system under chapter 35.95 RCW within the county in which the public transportation benefit area is located. This method of annexation is an alternative method and is additional to all other methods provided for in this chapter.(2) An authority and the governing body of an adjacent city described in subsection (1) of this section may jointly initiate an annexation process for annexing the city into the public transportation benefit area by adopting an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW and under this subsection between the authority and the city. The authority and the city shall jointly agree on the annexation and its effective date. The interlocal agreement must set a date for a public hearing on the agreement for annexation.(3) A public hearing must be held by each governing body, separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each governing body holding a public hearing shall:(a) Separately or jointly, publish a notice of availability of the agreement at least once a week for four weeks before the date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the public transportation benefit area and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the city; and(b) If the governing body has the ability to do so, post the notice of availability of the agreement on its website for the same four weeks that the notice is published in the newspapers under (a) of this subsection. The notice must describe where the public may review the agreement.(4) On the date set for hearing, the public must be afforded an opportunity to be heard. Following the hearing, if the governing body determines to undertake the annexation, it must do so by ordinance, if a city's governing body, and by resolution, if a public transportation benefit area's governing body. Upon the effective date of the annexation the city annexed must (a) become part of the public transportation benefit area, (b) be subject to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations of the public transportation benefit area, (c) cease imposing a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.045, and ((must))(d) cease operating a transit system under chapter 35.95 RCW. Upon passage of the annexation ordinance and resolution a certified copy of each must be filed with the legislative authority of the county in which the city is located.(5) After an annexation under this section occurs, the county legislative authority of the county in which the public transportation benefit area is located may by resolution annex (([the])) county area under its jurisdiction into the public transportation benefit area, which annexed area must then be subject to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations of the public transportation benefit area. This method of annexation is an alternative method and is additional to all other methods provided for in this chapter.PART XII: WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES DEBIT CARD FEESSec. 1201. RCW 47.60.860 and 2025 c 417 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington state ferries shall implement cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least three percent in credit card, debit card, and other financial transaction costs related to the collection of ferry fares imposed under RCW 47.60.290 and 47.60.315. As part of the cost recovery mechanisms, the Washington state ferries may recover transaction fees incurred through credit card and debit card transactions. The Washington state ferries must notify customers of the fee at the point of sale and itemize the fee on customer receipts. Costs recovered under this section may not be considered revenue for the purposes of fare setting.PART XIII: ACCOUNT INTEREST EARNINGSSec. 1301. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 802, 2025 c 399 s 15, 2025 c 359 s 12, and 2025 c 299 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the agency financial transaction account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the carbon emissions reduction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate commitment act transportation account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the complete streets grant program account, the connecting Washington account, the Cooper Jones active transportation safety account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the driver licensing technology support account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the ignition interlock device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the license plate technology account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine fuel tax refund account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the recreation resource account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the sustainable aviation fuel account, the sustainable aviation fuel airport infrastructure account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1302. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 802, 2025 c 399 s 15, and 2025 c 299 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the agency financial transaction account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the carbon emissions reduction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate commitment act transportation account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the complete streets grant program account, the connecting Washington account, the Cooper Jones active transportation safety account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the driver licensing technology support account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the ignition interlock device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the license plate technology account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine fuel tax refund account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the recreation resource account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the sustainable aviation fuel account, the sustainable aviation fuel airport infrastructure account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1303. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 359 s 13, and 2025 c 299 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the agency financial transaction account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the carbon emissions reduction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate commitment act transportation account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the complete streets grant program account, the connecting Washington account, the Cooper Jones active transportation safety account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the driver licensing technology support account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the ignition interlock device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the license plate technology account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine fuel tax refund account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the recreation resource account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the sustainable aviation fuel account, the sustainable aviation fuel airport infrastructure account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1304. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, and 2025 c 299 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the agency financial transaction account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the carbon emissions reduction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate commitment act transportation account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the complete streets grant program account, the connecting Washington account, the Cooper Jones active transportation safety account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the driver licensing technology support account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the ignition interlock device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the license plate technology account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine fuel tax refund account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the recreation resource account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the sustainable aviation fuel account, the sustainable aviation fuel airport infrastructure account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1305. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 359 s 13, 2025 c 299 s 22, and 2025 c 228 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the agency financial transaction account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the carbon emissions reduction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate commitment act transportation account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the complete streets grant program account, the connecting Washington account, the Cooper Jones active transportation safety account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the driver licensing technology support account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the ignition interlock device revolving account, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the license plate technology account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine fuel tax refund account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the recreation resource account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the sustainable aviation fuel account, the sustainable aviation fuel airport infrastructure account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1306. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 299 s 22, and 2025 c 228 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the agency financial transaction account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the carbon emissions reduction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate commitment act transportation account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the complete streets grant program account, the connecting Washington account, the Cooper Jones active transportation safety account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the driver licensing technology support account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the ignition interlock device revolving account, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the license plate technology account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine fuel tax refund account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the recreation resource account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the sustainable aviation fuel account, the sustainable aviation fuel airport infrastructure account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1307. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2025 c 399 s 13 and 2025 c 190 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the pollution liability insurance program trust account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative trust account, the school zone safety account, the impaired driving safety account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1308. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2025 c 399 s 14 and 2025 c 190 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative trust account, the school zone safety account, the impaired driving safety account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.PART XIV: MISCELLANEOUSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1401. Sections 101, 102, 201 through 203, 301, and 302 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1402. Sections 402 and 403 of this act take effect November 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1403. Sections 404, 406, and 407 of this act take effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1404. (1) Section 1301 of this act expires the earlier of July 1, 2028, or when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(2) Section 1302 of this act expires July 1, 2028.(3) Section 1303 of this act expires the earlier of January 1, 2029, or when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(4) Section 1304 of this act expires January 1, 2029.(5) Section 1305 of this act expires when RCW 74.76.040 expires.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1405. (1) Section 1302 of this act takes effect when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(2) Sections 1303 and 1304 of this act take effect July 1, 2028.(3) Sections 1305 and 1306 of this act take effect January 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1406. (1) Section 1307 of this act expires July 1, 2030.(2) Section 404 of this act expires July 1, 2031.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1407. (1) Section 1308 of this act takes effect July 1, 2030.(2) Section 405 of this act takes effect July 1, 2031.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1408. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1409. Sections 401, 408, 601, and 1201 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.--- END ---